en: Tabla tonal/pitch range (bayan): Balanced; Bright/fast response; Deep bass; Other
ro-RO: Gama tonală/de înălțime a tablei (bayan): Echilibrat; Răspuns luminos/rapid; Bas profund; Altele
sv: Tabla ton-/tonhöjdsområde (bayan): Balanserad; Ljus/snabb respons; Djup bas; Annat
pt-PT: Intervalo tonal da tabla (bayan): Equilibrado; Resposta brilhante/rápida; Graves profundos; Outro
da: Tonalt interval eller pitch-interval for tabla (bayan): Afbalanceret; Lys/hurtig respons; Dyb bas; Andet
el: Τονικό/εύρος τόνου Tabla (bayan): Ισορροπημένο; Λαμπερός ήχος/γρήγορη απόκριση; Βαθύ μπάσο; Άλλο
de: on-/Tonhöhenbereich der Tabla (Bayan): Ausgewogen; Hell/Schnelle Ansprache; Tiefer Bass; Sonstige
ko: 타블라 음역/피치 범위(바얀): 밸런스; 브라이트/빠른 응답; 딥 베이스; 기타
cs: Rozsah ladění bubnu tabla (bayan): Vyvážený; Jasný / rychlá odezva; Hluboké basy; Jiné
th: วช่วงเสียง/ระดับเสียงของกลองตะบลา (กลองบายัน): สมดุล; สว่าง/ตอบสนองเร็ว; เบสลึก; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Tabla tonski/tonski raspon (bajan): Uravnoteženo; Svjetlo / brz odziv; Duboki bas; Ostalo
ja: タブラ音域／ピッチ範囲（バヤン）: バランス; ブライト/ファストレスポンス; ディープベース; その他
zh-CN: 塔布拉鼓音调/音高范围（低音鼓）: 均衡; 明亮/快速响应; 重低音; 其他
zh-TW: 塔布拉音調/音高範圍 (巴顏): 平衡; 明亮/快速反應; 深沉低音; 其他
pl: Zakres tonalny/wysokości dźwięku tabli (bayan): Zrównoważony; Jasny/szybka reakcja; Głęboki bas; Inny
ru: Тональный и высотный диапазон таблы (баян): Сбалансированный; Яркий/быстрый отклик; Глубокий бас; Другое
it: Gamma tonale/intonazione della tabla (bayan): Bilanciata; Risposta brillante/veloce; Bassi profondi; Altro
pt-BR: Tabla faixa tonal/de afinação (bayan): Equilibrado; Resposta brilhante/rápida; Baixo profundo; Outro
sk-SK: Rozsah tónov/výšky tably (bayan): Vyvážený; Jasný/rýchla odozva; Hlboké basy; Iný
hu: Tabla tónus-/hangmagasság-tartománya (bayan): Kiegyensúlyozott; Világos / gyors reakciójú; Mély basszus; Egyéb
nb: Tablas tone-/tonehøydeområde (bayan): Balansert; Klar/rask respons; Dyp bass; Annet
nl: Tabla toonhoogtebereik (bayan): Gebalanceerd; Helder/snelle respons; Diepe bas; Overig
vi: Phạm vi âm/cao độ Tabla (bayan): Cân bằng; Sáng/phản hồi nhanh; Bass sâu; Khác
lt-LT: Tablos (bayan) toninis / aukščio diapazonas: Subalansuotas; Skaidrus / greitas atsakas; Gilus bosas; Kita
es: Tabla tonal/rango de tono (bayan): Equilibrado; Brillante/respuesta rápida; Bajo profundo; Otro
fr: Registre tonal du tabla (bayan): Équilibré; Brillant/réponse rapide; Basse profonde; Autre
bg-BG: Диапазон на тонове/височина на табла (баян): Балансиран; Ярък/бърз отзвук; Дълбок бас; Друго
sl-SI: Tonalni/zvočni razpon table: Uravnotežen; Svetel zven/hiter odziv; Globok bas; Drugo
fi: Bayan-rummun sävelkorkeusalue: Tasapainoinen; Kirkas / nopea vaste; Syvä basso; Muu
tr: Tabla ton/perde aralığı (bayan): Dengeli; Parlak/hızlı tepki; Derin bas; Diğer